Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Chapter 23. Virginia Electric Utility Regulation Act.
§ 56-580.
Transmission and distribution of electric energy.

Subject to the provisions of § 56-585.1, the Commission shall continue to regulate pursuant to this title the distribution of retail electric energy to retail customers in the Commonwealth and, to the extent not prohibited by federal law, the transmission
of electric energy in the Commonwealth.

The Commission shall continue to regulate, to the extent not prohibited by federal law, the reliability, quality and maintenance by transmitters and distributors of their transmission and retail distribution systems.

The Commission shall develop codes of conduct governing the conduct of incumbent electric utilities and affiliates thereof when any such affiliates provide, or control any entity that provides, generation, distribution, or transmission services, to the
extent necessary to prevent impairment of competition. Nothing in this chapter shall prevent an incumbent electric utility from offering metering options to its customers.

The Commission shall permit the construction and operation of electrical generating facilities in Virginia upon a finding that such generating facility and associated facilities (i) will have no material adverse effect upon reliability of electric service
provided by any regulated public utility, (ii) are required by the public convenience and necessity, if a petition for such permit is filed after July 1, 2007, and if they are to be constructed and operated by any regulated utility
whose rates are regulated pursuant to § 56-585.1, and (iii) are not otherwise contrary to the public interest. In review of a petition for a certificate to construct and operate a generating facility described in this subsection,
the Commission shall give consideration to the effect of the facility and associated facilities on the environment and establish such conditions as may be desirable or necessary to minimize adverse environmental impact as provided
in § 56-46.1, unless exempt as a small renewable energy project for which the Department of Environmental Quality has issued a permit by rule pursuant to Article 5 (§ 10.1-1197.5 et seq.) of Chapter 11.1 of Title 10.1. In order
to avoid duplication of governmental activities, any valid permit or approval required for an electric generating plant and associated facilities issued or granted by a federal, state or local governmental entity charged by law
with responsibility for issuing permits or approvals regulating environmental impact and mitigation of adverse environmental impact or for other specific public interest issues such as building codes, transportation plans, and
public safety, whether such permit or approval is prior to or after the Commission’s decision, shall be deemed to satisfy the requirements of this section with respect to all matters that (i) are governed by the permit or approval
or (ii) are within the authority of, and were considered by, the governmental entity in issuing such permit or approval, and the Commission shall impose no additional conditions with respect to such matters. Nothing in this section
shall affect the ability of the Commission to keep the record of a case open. Nothing in this section shall affect any right to appeal such permits or approvals in accordance with applicable law. In the case of a proposed facility
located in a region that was designated as of July 1, 2001, as serious nonattainment for the one-hour ozone standard as set forth in the federal Clean Air Act, the Commission shall not issue a decision approving such proposed facility
that is conditioned upon issuance of any environmental permit or approval. The Commission shall complete any proceeding under this section, or under any provision of the Utility Facilities Act (§ 56-265.1 et seq.), involving an
application for a certificate, permit, or approval required for the construction or operation by a public utility of a small renewable energy project as defined in § 10.1-1197.5, within nine months following the utility’s submission
of a complete application therefore. Small renewable energy projects as defined in § 10.1-1197.5 are in the public interest and in determining whether to approve such project, the Commission shall liberally construe the provisions
of this title.

Nothing in this section shall impair the distribution service territorial rights of incumbent electric utilities, and incumbent electric utilities shall continue to provide distribution services within their exclusive service territories as established
by the Commission. Subject to the provisions of § 56-585.1, the Commission shall continue to exercise its existing authority over the provision of electric distribution services to retail customers in the Commonwealth including,
but not limited to, the authority contained in Chapters 10 (§ 56-232 et seq.) and 10.1 (§ 56-265.1 et seq.) of this title.

Nothing in this chapter shall impair the exclusive territorial rights of an electric utility owned or operated by a municipality as of July 1, 1999, or by an authority created by a governmental unit exempt from the referendum requirement of §

15.2-5403

. Nor shall any provision of this chapter apply to any such electric utility unless (i) that municipality or that authority created by a governmental unit exempt from the referendum requirement of §

15.2-5403

elects to have this chapter apply to that utility or (ii) that utility, directly or indirectly, sells, offers to sell or seeks to sell electric energy to any retail customer eligible to purchase electric energy from
any supplier in accordance with § 56-577 if that retail customer is outside the geographic area that was served by such municipality as of July 1, 1999, except (a) any area within the municipality that was served by an incumbent
public utility as of that date but was thereafter served by an electric utility owned or operated by a municipality or by an authority created by a governmental unit exempt from the referendum requirement of §

15.2-5403

pursuant to the terms of a franchise agreement between the municipality and the incumbent public utility, or (b) where the geographic area served by an electric utility owned or operated by a municipality is changed
pursuant to mutual agreement between the municipality and the affected incumbent public utility in accordance with § 56-265.4:1. If an electric utility owned or operated by a municipality as of July 1, 1999, or by an authority
created by a governmental unit exempt from the referendum requirement of §

15.2-5403

is made subject to the provisions of this chapter pursuant to clause (i) or (ii) of this subsection, then in such event the provisions of this chapter applicable to incumbent electric utilities shall also apply to
any such utility, mutatis mutandis.

The applicability of all provisions of this chapter except § 56-594 to any investor-owned incumbent electric utility supplying electric service to retail customers on January 1, 2003, whose service territory assigned to it by the Commission is located
entirely within Dickenson, Lee, Russell, Scott, and Wise Counties shall be suspended effective July 1, 2003, so long as such utility does not provide retail electric services in any other service territory in any jurisdiction to
customers who have the right to receive retail electric energy from another supplier. During any such suspension period, the utility’s rates shall be (i) its capped rates established pursuant to § 56-582 for the duration of the
capped rate period established thereunder, and (ii) determined thereafter by the Commission on the basis of such utility’s prudently incurred costs pursuant to Chapter 10 (§ 56-232 et seq.) of this title.

The expiration date of any certificates granted by the Commission pursuant to subsection D, for which applications were filed with the Commission prior to July 1, 2002, shall be extended for an additional two years from the expiration date that otherwise
would apply.

History.
1999, c. 411; 2000, c. 991; 2001, cc. 738, 748, 755; 2002, c. 483; 2003, c. 719; 2004, cc. 262, 827; 2006, cc. 811, 819, 929, 941; 2007, cc. 877, 888, 933; 2009, cc. 808, 854.

Cross references.

As to impact of electric generating facilities, see § 10.1-1186.2:1. As to limitation of State Corporation Commission authority, see § 10.1-1197.8. As to condemnation authority of localities, see §

15.2-1901

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2009, cc. 808 and 854, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods
of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and is $0 for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Acts 2009, cc. 808 and 854, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not apply to any small renewable energy project that has applied for or been granted approval by the State Corporation Commission prior to the effective date of regulations
promulgated by the Department of Environmental Quality, as set forth in this act; provided, however, that a small renewable energy project that has not yet received a final order from the State Corporation Commission shall not be precluded
from withdrawing its application at the State Corporation Commission and filing without prejudice with the Department of Environmental Quality for a permit-by-rule pursuant to this act.”

Acts 2011, c. 771, provides: “§ 1. That in order to promote solar energy through distributed generation, the State Corporation Commission shall exercise its existing authority to consider for approval, after notice to all affected parties and opportunity
for hearing, petitions filed by a utility to construct and operate distributed solar generation facilities and to offer special tariffs to facilitate customer-owned distributed solar generation as alternatives to net energy metering,
with an aggregate amount of rated generating capacity of up to 0.20 percent of each electric utility’s adjusted Virginia peak load for the calendar year 2010. Such petitions may be made during the period of July 1, 2011, through July
1, 2015, and the Commission, on its own motion, may extend this period an additional year for good cause. Each distributed solar generation installation approved pursuant to this section shall be considered to be part of a demonstration
program to assess benefits to the utility’s distribution system, including constrained or high load growth circuits, for a period of five years from the date each installation becomes operational. Thereafter each installation shall
cease to be part of a demonstration program and, in the case of a utility-owned installation, shall continue to operate as a utility-owned generating facility, and in the case of a customer-owned installation, shall continue to provide
power to the utility pursuant to the terms of the agreed upon tariff arrangement. Subject to review by the Commission, such utility-owned distributed solar generation facilities and tariffs for power generated from customer-owned distributed
solar installations shall be prioritized in areas identified by the utility as areas where localized solar generation would provide benefits to the utility’s distribution system, including constrained or high-growth areas. The Commission
shall approve such programs or distributed generation facilities if it determines that the programs or facilities, including those targeting constrained or high load growth areas, are reasonably designed to be in furtherance of the
public interest.

“§ 2. A utility participating in demonstration programs pursuant to § 1 of this act shall use reasonable efforts to ensure that at least four of the distributed solar installation sites included in the demonstration projects shall be in a community setting,
which shall include, but not be limited to, to the extent permitted by law, participation by local governments, schools, community associations, neighborhood associations, or nonprofit organizations. The capacity of each such community
installation shall not exceed 500 kilowatts.

“§ 3. When a utility proposes solar distributed generation resources as permitted in § 1 of this act comprised of multiple installations combined collectively, the Commission shall consider such projects as one small non-combustible renewable power generation
facility for purposes of project approval pursuant to §§ 10.1-1197.5, 10.1-1197.8, 56-265.2, 56-580 and 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia. A ‘small non-combustible renewable power generation facility’ is a small renewable energy project
that generates electricity from sunlight and may consist of one or more installations distributed on separate structures or facilities, whether such installations are treated each as a stand-alone small renewable energy project or
are combined and treated collectively as one small renewable energy project.

“§ 4. The Commission shall provide annual reports on any demonstration programs approved pursuant to this act to the Governor and the chairmen of the House and Senate Committees on Commerce and Labor.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 991, in subsection C, deleted “or any” and inserted “made competitive pursuant to § 56-581.1.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendments by cc. 738 and 755 are identical, and added the language beginning “except any area within” and ending “incumbent public utility” in subsection F.

The 2001 amendment by c. 748 added the last sentence in subsection F.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 483, in subsection D, in the first sentence, substituted “shall” for “may,” and deleted “including transmission lines and equipment” preceding “(i)”; substituted “a” for “its” preceding “petition” in the second sentence, and deleted
“including transmission lines and equipment” following “associated facilities” in the that sentence; and added the four final sentences.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 719 added subsection G.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 262 and 827 are nearly identical, and added subsection H.

Subsection H is set out in the form above at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 811 and 819 are identical, and inserted the clause (a) designation and clause (b) at the end of the first sentence in subsection F.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 929 and 941 are identical, and inserted “or by an authority created by a governmental unit exempt from the referendum requirement of §

15.2-5403

” four times in subsection F.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 877 inserted “all provisions of” and “except § 56-594” in the first sentence of subsection G.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 888 and 933 are identical, and inserted “Subject to the provisions of § 56-585.1” at the beginning of subsection A; in subsection C, deleted “made competitive pursuant to § 56-581.1” preceding “to the extent” and made related
changes, and added the last sentence; in subsection D, inserted “in Virginia” and clause (ii) and made related changes; substituted “Subject to the provisions of § 56-585.1, the Commission shall continue to exercise its” for “Nothing
in this chapter shall impair the Commission’s” in the last sentence of subsection E; and inserted “eligible to purchase electric energy from any supplier in accordance with § 56-577 if that retail customer is” in the next-to-last sentence
of subsection F.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 808 and 854 are identical, and in subsection D, in the second sentence, added the language beginning “unless exempt as” at the end, and added the last two sentences.

Law Review.

For article surveying changes in environmental law in Virginia from June 2001 to June 2002, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 117 (2002).

§ 56-581.
Regulation of rates subject to Commission’s jurisdiction.

After the expiration or termination of capped rates except as provided in § 56-585.1, the Commission shall regulate the rates of investor-owned incumbent electric utilities for the transmission of electric energy, to the extent not prohibited by federal
law, and for the generation of electric energy and the distribution of electric energy to retail customers pursuant to § 56-585.1.

Beginning July 1, 1999, and thereafter, no cooperative that was a member of a power supply cooperative on January 1, 1999, shall be obligated to file any rate rider as a consequence of an increase or decrease in the rates, other than fuel costs, of its
wholesale supplier, nor must any adjustment be made to such cooperative’s rates as a consequence thereof.

Except for the provision of default services under § 56-585 or emergency services in § 56-586, nothing in this chapter shall authorize the Commission to regulate the rates or charges for electric service to the Commonwealth and its municipalities.

History.
1999, c. 411; 2000, c. 991; 2007, cc. 888, 933.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 991 deleted former subsection B relating to metering, and redesignated former subsections C and D as present subsections B and C.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 888 and 933 are identical, and rewrote subsection A.

Law Review.

For comment, “My Two Cents Per Kilowatt-Hour: Virginia’s Renewable Energy Portfolio Standard,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 755 (2007).

§ 56-581.1.
Repealed by Acts 2007, cc. 888 and 933, cl. 2.

Cross references.

For current provisions as to retail electric billing and metering, see § 56-585.1.

Editor’s note.

Former § 56-581.1, pertaining to competitive retail electric billing and metering, derived from 2000, c. 991; 2001, c. 748; 2003, c. 885.

§ 56-582.
Rate caps.

The Commission shall establish capped rates, effective January 1, 2001, for each service territory of every incumbent utility as follows:

Capped rates shall be established for customers purchasing bundled electric transmission, distribution and generation services from an incumbent electric utility.

Capped rates for electric generation services, only, shall also be established for the purpose of effecting customer choice for those retail customers authorized under this chapter to purchase generation services from a supplier other than the incumbent
utility during this period.

The capped rates established under this section shall be the rates in effect for each incumbent utility as of the effective date of this chapter, or rates subsequently placed into effect pursuant to a rate application filed by an incumbent electric utility
with the Commission prior to January 1, 2001, and subsequently approved by the Commission, and made by an incumbent electric utility that is not currently bound by a rate case settlement adopted by the Commission that extends
in its application beyond January 1, 2002. If such rate application is filed, the rates proposed therein shall go into effect on January 1, 2001, but such rates shall be interim in nature and subject to refund until such
time as the Commission has completed its investigation of such application. Any amount of the rates found excessive by the Commission shall be subject to refund with interest, as may be ordered by the Commission. The Commission
shall act upon such applications prior to January 1, 2002. Such rate application and the Commission’s approval shall give due consideration, on a forward-looking basis, to the justness and reasonableness of rates to be
effective for a period of time ending as late as July 1, 2007. The capped rates established under this section, which include rates, tariffs, electric service contracts, and rate programs (including experimental rates,
regardless of whether they otherwise would expire), shall be such rates, tariffs, contracts, and programs of each incumbent electric utility, provided that experimental rates and rate programs may be closed to new customers
upon application to the Commission. Such capped rates shall also include rates for new services where, subsequent to January 1, 2001, rate applications for any such rates are filed by incumbent electric utilities with the
Commission and are thereafter approved by the Commission. In establishing such rates for new services, the Commission may use any rate method that promotes the public interest and that is fairly compensatory to any utilities
requesting such rates.

The Commission may adjust such capped rates in connection with the following: (i) utilities’ recovery of fuel and purchased power costs pursuant to § 56-249.6, and, if applicable, in accordance with the terms of any Commission order approving the divestiture
of generation assets pursuant to § 56-590, (ii) any changes in the taxation by the Commonwealth of incumbent electric utility revenues, (iii) any financial distress of the utility beyond its control, (iv) with respect to cooperatives
that were not members of a power supply cooperative on January 1, 1999, and as long as they do not become members, their cost of purchased wholesale power and discounts from capped rates to match the cost of providing distribution
services, (v) with respect to cooperatives that were members of a power supply cooperative on January 1, 1999, their recovery of fuel costs, through the wholesale power cost adjustment clauses of their tariffs pursuant to § 56-231.33,
and (vi) with respect to incumbent electric utilities that were not, as of the effective date of this chapter, bound by a rate case settlement adopted by the Commission that extended in its application beyond January 1, 2002, the
Commission shall adjust such utilities’ capped rates, not more than once in any 12-month period, for the timely recovery of their incremental costs for transmission or distribution system reliability and compliance with state or
federal environmental laws or regulations to the extent such costs are prudently incurred on and after July 1, 2004. Any adjustments pursuant to § 56-249.6 and clause (i) of this subsection by an incumbent electric utility that
transferred all of its generation assets to an affiliate with the approval of the Commission pursuant to § 56-590 prior to January 1, 2002, shall be effective only on and after July 1, 2007. Notwithstanding the provisions of §
56-249.6, the Commission may authorize tariffs that include incentives designed to encourage an incumbent electric utility to reduce its fuel costs by permitting retention of a portion of cost savings resulting from fuel cost reductions
or by other methods determined by the Commission to be fair and reasonable to the utility and its customers.

A utility may petition the Commission to terminate the capped rates to all customers any time after January 1, 2004, and such capped rates may be terminated upon the Commission finding of an effectively competitive market for generation services within
the service territory of that utility. If its capped rates, as established and adjusted from time to time pursuant to subsections A and B, are continued after January 1, 2004, an incumbent electric utility that is not, as of the
effective date of this chapter, bound by a rate case settlement adopted by the Commission that extends in its application beyond January 1, 2002, may petition the Commission, during the period January 1, 2004, through June 30,
2007, for approval of a one-time change in its rates, and if the capped rates are continued after July 1, 2007, such incumbent electric utility may at any time after July 1, 2007, petition the Commission for approval of a one-time
change in its rates. Any change in rates pursuant to this subsection by an incumbent electric utility that divested its generation assets with approval of the Commission pursuant to § 56-590 prior to January 1, 2002, shall be in
accordance with the terms of any Commission order approving such divestiture. Any petition for changes to capped rates filed pursuant to this subsection shall be governed by the provisions of Chapter 10 (§ 56-232 et seq.) of this
title.

Until the expiration or termination of capped rates as provided in this section, the incumbent electric utility, consistent with the functional separation plan implemented under § 56-590, shall make electric service available at capped rates established
under this section to any customer in the incumbent electric utility’s service territory, including any customer that, until the expiration or termination of capped rates, requests such service after a period of utilizing service
from another supplier.

During the period when capped rates are in effect for an incumbent electric utility, such utility may file with the Commission a plan describing the method used by such utility to assure full funding of its nuclear decommissioning obligation and specifying
the amount of the revenues collected under either the capped rates, as provided in this section, or the wires charges, as provided in former § 56-583, that are dedicated to funding such nuclear decommissioning obligation under
the plan. The Commission shall approve the plan upon a finding that the plan is not contrary to the public interest.

The capped rates established pursuant to this section shall expire on December 31, 2008, unless sooner terminated by the Commission pursuant to the provisions of subsection C; however, rates after the expiration or termination of capped rates shall equal
capped rates until such rates are changed pursuant to other provisions of this title.

History.
1999, c. 411; 2000, cc. 942, 991; 2001, c. 748; 2004, c. 827; 2007, cc. 888, 933; 2008, c. 883.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, Sp. Sess. I, c. 3, cl. 5, provides: “That notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, including § 56-582 of the Code of Virginia, any public utility that is, as a result of the provisions of this act, subject to a sales and use tax
on tangible personal property purchased or leased for use or consumption by such utility in the rendition of its public service is hereby authorized to recover from each customer that customer’s pro rata share of the public utility’s
actual expense therefor by means of a sales and use tax surcharge. The surcharge shall be subject to annual review and verification by the State Corporation Commission in the year subsequent to the surcharge, based on data provided
in an annual information filing or other information provided to the State Corporation Commission by such utility; however, such review and verification shall neither constitute a rate case nor be the subject of a rate case. If the
State Corporation Commission determines that the amount of the surcharge differed from the actual sales and use tax incurred as a result of the provisions of this act, a surcharge adjustment shall be applied in the following year.
Any excess in the surcharge shall be refunded to ratepayers as a deduction against the surcharge to be imposed in that subsequent year. Any shortfall in the surcharge shall be recovered through an increase in the surcharge to be imposed
in that subsequent year. A surcharge that is allocated on a proportionate basis or according to the allocation factors in the utility’s most recent State Corporation Commission-approved cost allocation study shall be presumed valid.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 942, in the first sentence of subsection B, inserted “the following” preceding “(i)”; inserted “with” following “(iv)”; inserted “and discounts from capped rates to match the cost of providing distribution services,” in clause
(iv); and inserted “with” following “(v)”.

The 2000 amendment by c. 991, in subdivision A 3, added the second and third sentences, and deleted “and capped rates determined pursuant to such applications shall become effective on January 1, 2001” in the fourth sentence.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 748 added the last two sentences in subsection A, and substituted “pursuant to § 56-231.33” for “pursuant to § 56-226” in clause (v) in subsection B.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 827 deleted “and expiring on July 1, 2007” following “January 1, 2001” in the introductory paragraph of subsection A; in subsection B, in the first sentence, inserted “and purchased power” and “and, if applicable, in accordance
with the terms . . . pursuant to § 56-590” and added clause (vi) at the end and added the next-to-last sentence; in subsection C, in the second sentence, inserted “as established and adjusted from time to time pursuant to subsections
A and B” and “during the period January 1, 2004, through June 30, 2007,” substituted “its” for “the nongeneration components of such,” and added the language beginning “and if the capped rates are continued” to the end of the paragraph;
added subsection F; and made stylistic changes.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 888 and 933 are identical, and inserted “former” preceding “§ 56-583” in the first sentence of subsection E; and in subsection F, substituted “2008” for “2010” and added the language beginning “however, rates after” to the end.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 883 substituted “January 1, 2002” for “commencement of the period of transition to customer choice” in the fourth sentence in subdivision A 3.

Law Review.

For comment, “My Two Cents Per Kilowatt-Hour: Virginia’s Renewable Energy Portfolio Standard,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 755 (2007).

For article, “Public Utility Law,” see 43 U. Rich. L. Rev. 295 (2008).

§ 56-583.
Repealed by Acts 2007, cc. 888 and 933, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former § 56-583, pertaining to wires charges, derived from 1999, c. 411; 2000, c. 991; 2004, c. 827.

§ 56-584.
Stranded costs.

Just and reasonable net stranded costs, to the extent that they exceed zero value in total for the incumbent electric utility, shall be recoverable by each incumbent electric utility provided each incumbent electric utility shall only recover its just
and reasonable net stranded costs through either capped rates as provided in § 56-582. To the extent not preempted by federal law, the establishment by the Commission of wires charges for any distribution cooperative shall be conditioned
upon such cooperative entering into binding commitments by which it will pay to any power supply cooperative of which such distribution cooperative is or was a member, as compensation for such power supply cooperative’s stranded costs,
all or part of the proceeds of such wires charges, as determined by the Commission.

History.
1999, c. 411; 2007, cc. 888, 933.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 888 and 933 are identical, and deleted “or wires charges as provided in § 56-583” from the end of the first sentence.

§ 56-585.
Default service.

The Commission shall, after notice and opportunity for hearing, (i) determine the components of default service and (ii) establish one or more programs making such services available to retail customers requiring them during the availability throughout
the Commonwealth of customer choice for all retail customers as established pursuant to § 56-577. For purposes of this chapter, “default service” means service made available under this section to retail customers who (i) do not
affirmatively select a supplier, (ii) are unable to obtain service from an alternative supplier, or (iii) have contracted with an alternative supplier who fails to perform. Availability of default service shall expire upon the
expiration or termination of capped rates.

A distributor shall have the obligation and right to be the supplier of default services in its certificated service territory, and shall do so, in a safe and reliable manner, at rates determined pursuant to subsection C; however, the Commission may not
require a distributor, or affiliate thereof, to provide any such services outside the territory in which such distributor provides service.

Until the expiration or termination of capped rates, the rates for default service shall equal the capped rates established pursuant to subdivision A 2 of § 56-582.

A distribution electric cooperative, or one or more affiliates thereof, shall have the obligation and right to be the supplier of default services in its certificated service territory. A distribution electric cooperative’s rates for such default services
shall be the capped rate for the duration of the capped rate period. Subsections B and C shall not apply to a distribution electric cooperative or its rates. Such default services, for the purposes of this subsection, shall include
the supply of electric energy.

History.
1999, c. 411; 2000, c. 991; 2001, c. 748; 2003, c. 885; 2004, c. 827; 2007, cc. 888, 933.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 991 inserted the second sentence in subsection E.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 748 rewrote subsections A through C, added present subsection D, redesignated former subsections D and E as present subsections E and F, and added the second and third sentences in subsection F.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 885 substituted “Commission on Electric Utility Restructuring” for “Legislative Transition Task Force” in subsection E.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 827 added “except as provided in subsection G” at the end of subdivision C 2; and added subsection G.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 888 and 933 are identical, and rewrote the section.